Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 12

Department of Labor

25-12-101. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This chapter, concerning the Department of Labor, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5527, effective July 1, 2019. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-12-101. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-915.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 206, § 22, provided:

“CASH PRIZES – STATE PARKS. The Department of Parks & Tourism is hereby authorized to award merchandise, gift certificates and cash prizes to contestants in various special events authorized by the Director of State Parks. Such prizes may be awarded to the 1st, 2nd and 3rd prize winners and shall be payable from the maintenance and operation line item of the Parks Cash Fund. The cash prizes, in aggregate, for all contests, shall not exceed $10,000 per fiscal year.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”Acts 2015, No. 988, § 22, provided:

“CASH PRIZES — STATE PARKS. The Department of Parks & Tourism is hereby authorized to award merchandise, gift certificates and cash prizes to contestants in various special events authorized by the Director of State Parks. Such prizes may be awarded to the 1st, 2nd and 3rd prize winners and shall be payable from the maintenance and operation line item of the Parks Cash Fund. The cash prizes, in aggregate, for all contests, shall not exceed $10,000 per fiscal year.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”Acts 2016, No. 208, § 22, provided:

“CASH PRIZES — STATE PARKS. The Department of Parks & Tourism is hereby authorized to award merchandise, gift certificates and cash prizes to contestants in various special events authorized by the Director of State Parks. Such prizes may be awarded to the 1st, 2nd and 3rd prize winners and shall be payable from the maintenance and operation line item of the Parks Cash Fund. The cash prizes, in aggregate, for all contests, shall not exceed $10,000 per fiscal year.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-13-101 — 25-13-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning general provisions, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5708, effective July 1, 2019. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-13-101. Acts 1971, No. 38, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-907.

25-13-103. Acts 1993, No. 728, § 37; 1995, No. 1038, § 42.

For current law, see §25-43-1301 et seq.

Subchapter 2

— Retirement and Relocation Division

25-13-201 — 25-13-204. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment of §25-13-204 by Acts 1997, No. 250 is superseded by the repeal of this subchapter by Acts 1997, No. 609.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 609, § 9. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-13-201. Acts 1995, No. 1255, § 1.

25-13-203. Acts 1995, No. 1255, § 3.

Subchapter 3

— Retirement and Relocation Program

25-13-301, 25-13-302. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1508, § 14. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-13-301. Acts 1997, No. 609, § 1.